src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON CIEZALOGI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:ehča%>#lohki%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:ehča%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Ess:ehča%>n#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:ehča%>n#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža%>#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:eža%>#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:eža%>#logi%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:eža%>#lot%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:eža%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:eža%>jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:eža%>n#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:eža%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:eža%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:eža%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:eža%>#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža%>#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:eža%>#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža%>#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>jde#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jd9#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jgujn#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:eža%>t#lot%> K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:eža%>jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:eža%>jd#lot%> K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:eža%>jn#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>t#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON GAVCCI
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:%> K ; ! 
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:»X4# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K ;

LEXICON GAVCCINUPPELOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#nuppe#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#nuppe#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#nuppe#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GAVCCIGOALMMATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#goalmmát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#goalmmát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GAVCCINJEALJATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#njealját#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4#njealját#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#njealját#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#njealját#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#njealját#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#njealját#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X4#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X4#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X4#njealját#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X4#njealját#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X4#njealját#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
gávccinuppelohkái:gák'ci GAVCCINUPPELOHKAI ;
gávccinuppelohkái+Use/Sub:gák'ce GAVCCINUPPELOHKAI ;
gávccigoalmmátlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
gávccinjealjátlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCINJEALJATLOHKAI ;
ovccinuppelohkái:ok'ci GAVCCINUPPELOHKAI ;
ovccigoalmmátlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
ovccinjealjátlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCINJEALJATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
gávccinuppelohkái:gák'ci GAVCCINUPPELOHKAI ;
gávccigoalmmátlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCIGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
gávccinjealjátlohkái:gák'ci GAVCCINJEALJATLOHKAI ;
ovccinuppelohkái:ok'ci GAVCCINUPPELOHKAI ;
ovccigoalmmátlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCIGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
ovccinjealjátlohkái:ok'ci GAVCCINJEALJATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON CUODI
čuođičiežalogi:čuođi#či CIEZALOGI ;
čuođigiežalogi:čuođi#gi CIEZALOGI ;
oktačuohtičiežalogi:okta#čuohti#či CIEZALOGI ;
oktačuohtigiežalogi:okta#čuohti#gi CIEZALOGI ;
čuohtičiežalogi:čuohti#či CIEZALOGI ;
čuohtigiežalogi:čuohti#gi CIEZALOGI ;
LEXICON num-imprecise
beal% gávcci+Use/Sub:beal#gák'ci GAVCCI ; !time
beal% ovcci+Use/Sub:beal#ok'ci GAVCCI ; !time
beal% gávcci:beal% gák'ci GAVCCI ; !time
beal% ovcci:beal% ok'ci GAVCCI ; !time
